North Dakota, session 69, HB1428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 57-39.2-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
created and enacted as follows:
Gross receipts from sales of used clothing made by a thrift store owned and operated
by a nonprofit corporation exempt from federal taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3)].
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable events occurring after
June 30, 2025.
Page No. 1 25.1129.01000